Tennessee, session 114, SB2269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-5-105(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "forty-eight (48)" and substituting "seventy-two (72)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2269
011958
- 1 -